Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ADVANCED 21ST CENTURY FARMING EQUIPMENT FOR BLACK VETERAN FARMERS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of agriculture must award a grant to the Minnesota Black Farmers Association to purchase advanced 21st century farming equipment, including skid steers and John Deere tractors with attachments, for use by members of a cooperative of Black veteran farmers. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for a grant to the Minnesota Black Farmers Association to purchase advanced 21st century farming equipment for use by members of a cooperative of Black veteran farmers. new text end